Hawaii statutes.
§451J-6 Exemptions. (a) Licensure
shall not be required of:

(1) A person doing work within the scope of practice
or duties of the person's profession that overlaps with the practice of
marriage and family therapy; provided the person does not purport to be a
marriage and family therapist or licensed marriage and family therapist;

(2) Any student enrolled in an accredited educational
institution in a recognized program of study leading toward attainment of a
graduate degree in marriage and family therapy or other professional field;
provided that the student's activities and services are part of a prescribed
course of study supervised by the educational institution and the student is
identified by an appropriate title including but not limited to "marriage
and family therapy student or trainee", "clinical psychology student
or trainee", "clinical social work student or trainee", or any
title which clearly indicates training status; or

(3) Any individual who uses the title marriage and
family therapy intern for the purpose of obtaining clinical experience in
accordance with section 451J-7(3).

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to prevent qualified members of other licensed professions as defined by any
law, rule, or the department, including but not limited to social workers,
psychologists, registered nurses, or physicians, from doing or advertising that
they assist or treat individuals, couples, or families consistent with the
accepted standards of their respective licensed professions; provided that no
person, unless the person is licensed as a marriage and family therapist, shall
use the title of marriage and family therapist or licensed marriage and family
therapist. [L 1998, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 29, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next